Georgia, session 2025_26, HB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income taxes,
is amended in Code Section 48-7-27, relating to computation of taxable net income, by
revising paragraph (5.1) of subsection (a) as follows:
"(5.1)(A) Up to $17,500.00 of All income received by an individual who is less than 62
years of age paid to such paid to an individual as retirement benefits from military service
in the armed forces of the United States or the reserve components thereof and an
additional amount of up to $17,500.00 of such income, provided that he or she has
Georgia earned income otherwise included in his or her Georgia taxable net income in
an amount that exceeds $17,500.00.
- 1 -

LC 50 1224S
(B) In the case of a married couple filing jointly, each spouse who is otherwise
qualified for an exclusion allowed by this paragraph shall be individually entitled to
exclude retirement income received by that spouse up to the exclusion amount.
(C) The exclusions exclusion provided for in this paragraph shall not apply to or affect
and shall be in addition to those adjustments to net income provided for under any other
paragraph of this subsection;"
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 2 -